Maryland, session 2026, SB0687.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Environment
4–201.1.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Environmental site design” means using small–scale stormwater
management practices, nonstructural techniques, and better site planning to mimic
natural hydrologic runoff characteristics and minimize the impact of land development on
water resources.
(c) “Environmental site design” includes:
(1) Optimizing conservation of natural features, such as drainage patterns,
soils, and vegetation;
(2) Minimizing use of impervious surfaces;
(3) Slowing down runoff to maintain discharge timing and to increase
infiltration and evapotranspiration; and
(4) Using other nonstructural practices or innovative stormwater
management technologies approved by the Department.
(d) (1) “Impervious surface” means a surface that does not allow stormwater
to infiltrate into the ground.
(2) “Impervious surface” includes rooftops, driveways, sidewalks, or
pavement.
(e) “Precipitation data” means historical data that describes the relationship
between precipitation intensity, duration, and return period.
4–203.
(a) The Department of the Environment shall implement the provisions of this
subtitle and shall consult the Department of Natural Resources from time to time,
including during the adoption of regulations, concerning the impact of stormwater on
waters of the State.
(b) (1) The Department shall adopt rules and regulations which establish
criteria and procedures for stormwater management in Maryland.
(2) The rules and regulations shall:

SENATE BILL 687 3
(i) Indicate that the primary goal of the State and local programs
will be to maintain after development, as nearly as possible, the predevelopment runoff
characteristics;
(ii) Make allowance for the difference in hydrologic characteristics
and stormwater management needs of different parts of the State;
(iii) Specify that watershed–wide analyses may be necessary to
prevent undesirable downstream effects of increased stormwater runoff;
(iv) Specify the exemptions a county or municipality may grant from
the requirements of submitting a stormwater management plan;
(v) 1. Specify the minimum content of the local ordinances or the
rules and regulations of the affected county governing body to be adopted which may be
done by inclusion of a model ordinance or model rules and regulations; and
2. Establish regulations and a model ordinance that require:
A. The implementation of environmental site design to the
maximum extent practicable;
B. The review and modification, if necessary, of planning and
zoning or public works ordinances to remove impediments to environmental site design
implementation; and
C. A developer to demonstrate that environmental site
design has been implemented to the maximum extent practicable and standard best
management practices have been used only where absolutely necessary;
(vi) Indicate that water quality practices may be required for any
redevelopment, even when predevelopment runoff characteristics are maintained;
(vii) Specify the minimum requirements for inspection and
maintenance of stormwater practices;
(viii) Specify that all stormwater management plans shall be designed
to:
1. Prevent soil erosion from any development project;
2. Prevent, to the maximum extent practicable, an increase
in nonpoint pollution;
3. Maintain the integrity of stream channels for their
biological function, as well as for drainage;

SENATE BILL 687
4. Minimize pollutants in stormwater runoff from new
development and redevelopment in order to:
A. Restore, enhance, and maintain the chemical, physical,
and biological integrity of the waters of the State;
B. Protect public health;
C. Safeguard fish and aquatic life and scenic and ecological
values; and
D. Enhance the domestic, municipal, recreational, industrial,
and other uses of water as specified by the Department;
5. Protect public safety through the proper design and
operation of stormwater management facilities;
6. Maintain 100% of average annual predevelopment
groundwater recharge volume for the site;
7. Capture and treat stormwater runoff to remove pollutants
and enhance water quality;
8. Implement a channel protection strategy to reduce
downstream erosion in receiving streams; and
9. Implement quantity control strategies to prevent
increases in the frequency and magnitude of out–of–bank flooding from large, less frequent
storm events;
(ix) 1. Establish a comprehensive process for approving grading
and sediment control plans and stormwater management plans; and
2. Specify that the comprehensive process established under
item (i) of this item takes into account the cumulative impacts of both plans; and
(x) Incorporate the most recent precipitation data available.
(3) (i) The Department shall review and update the regulations
adopted under this section at least once every 5 years.
(ii) In reviewing and updating the regulations adopted under this
section, the Department shall:
1. At a minimum, revise water quality and water quantity
control standards using the most recent precipitation data available; and

SENATE BILL 687 5
2. As necessary, update and revise the regulations to meet
the requirements of this subtitle.
(4) (i) On or before November 1, 2021, the Department shall report to
the General Assembly, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, on:
1. The most recent precipitation data available;
2. The Department’s plans for immediately updating water
quantity control standards for watersheds where flooding events occurred on or after
January 1, 2000; and
3. The Department’s plans for updating all other regulations
adopted under this section.
(ii) After November 1, 2021, the Department shall report to the
General Assembly, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, on any
revisions the Department intends to make to the regulations adopted under this section
before publishing the regulations.
(c) (1) At least 6 months before the proposal of regulations under this section,
the Department shall:
(i) Post the regulatory process that the Department follows on the
Department’s website; and
(ii) Consult with the following groups and stakeholders on the
impact of the proposed regulations:
1. The Commission on Environmental Justice and
Sustainable Communities; and
2. Stakeholders with expertise on stormwater design
standards and climate science, including stakeholders from:
A. An academic institution;
B. The Chesapeake Bay Program;
C. The Chesapeake Bay Commission;
D. The Maryland Emergency Management Agency;
E. The Maryland Association of Soil Conservation Districts;
F. Local government;

SENATE BILL 687
G. A private sector entity with design and construction
experience; and
H. An association that has expertise in stormwater
restoration projects.
(2) Before any regulations required under this section are adopted, the
Department shall hold at least one public hearing in the affected immediate geographic
areas of the State and shall consult with the affected counties and municipalities.
(d) The Department may not delay the implementation of any new requirements
or standards established under regulations adopted under this section.
(e) The Department shall provide technical assistance, training, research, and
coordination in stormwater management technology to the local governments consistent
with the purposes of this subtitle.
5–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Administration” means the Water and Science Administration.
(c) “Appropriate county governing body” means the county commissioners of any
nonchartered county or the county council of any chartered county in which a portion of the
watershed is located.
(d) “County” includes Baltimore City unless otherwise indicated.
(e) “Department” means the Department of the Environment.
(f) “Director” means the Director of the Water and Science Administration.
(g) “FLOOD RISK” MEANS THE POTENTIAL FOR IMPACTS TO LIFE,
PROPERTY, INFRASTRUCTURE, OR NATURAL RESOURCES RESULTING FROM TIDAL
FLOODING, NONTIDAL FLOODING, OR STORMWATER RUNOFF.
(H) “Person” includes the federal government, the State, any county, municipal
corporation, or other political subdivision of the State, or any of their units, or an individual,
receiver, trustee, guardian, executor, administrator, fiduciary, or representative of any
kind, or any partnership, firm, association, public or private corporation, or any other
entity.
[(h)] (I) (1) “Pollution” means every contamination or other alteration of the
physical, chemical, or biological properties of any waters of the State.

SENATE BILL 687 7
(2) “Pollution” includes change in temperature, taste, color, turbidity, or
odor of the waters of the State or the discharge or deposit of any organic matter, harmful
organism, or liquid, gaseous, solid, radioactive, or other substance into any waters of the
State as will render the waters of the State harmful, detrimental, or injurious to public
health, safety, or welfare, domestic, commercial, industrial, agricultural, recreational,
other legitimate beneficial uses, or livestock, wild animals, birds or fish or other aquatic
life.
[(i)] (J) “Public water system” has the meaning stated in § 9–401 of this article.
[(j)] (K) “Secretary” means the Secretary of the Environment.
[(k)] (L) “Water management strategy area” means an area designated by the
Department in which a specific water resource problem has been identified and for which
the Department has adopted specific water use restrictions or criteria for permit approval
in order to protect the water resource or existing water users.
[(l)] (M) “Waters of the State” includes:
(1) Both surface and underground waters within the boundaries of the
State subject to its jurisdiction;
(2) That portion of the Atlantic Ocean within the boundaries of the State;
(3) The Chesapeake Bay and its tributaries;
(4) All ponds, lakes, rivers, streams, public ditches, tax ditches, and public
drainage systems within the State, other than those designed and used to collect, convey,
or dispose of sanitary sewage; and
(5) The floodplain of free–flowing waters determined by the Department on
the basis of the 100–year flood frequency.
5–701.
(a) (1) The Department is responsible for developing and carrying out a long
range program for controlling flood waters in the State.
(2) In addition, the Department shall cooperate with the federal and local
governments to control State flood waters and serve in a liaison capacity to these
governments in any flood control matter.
(b) The Department shall [provide]:

SENATE BILL 687
(1) PROVIDE technical assistance to local governments and other State
units to interpret flood information and draft local land use and other regulations
pertaining to areas subject to flooding[. It shall review];
(2) REVIEW plans for local public works and exercise regulatory control
over them in or on waters of the State as provided in Subtitle 5 of this title[. The
Department shall administer]; AND
(3) ADMINISTER financial assistance for flood control as funds for this
purpose are made available.
5–802.
(a) The General Assembly finds and declares that:
(1) Recurrent flooding of a portion of the State’s land resources causes loss
of life, damage to property, disruption of commerce and governmental services, and
unsanitary conditions, all of which are detrimental to the health, safety, welfare, and
property of the occupants of flood hazard areas of the State;
(2) Considerable public costs are incurred through the emergency
preparedness program and by replacing public utilities and other public capital
investments destroyed or damaged by floods;
(3) Flood waters disregard jurisdictional boundaries; and
(4) The public interest necessitates management of waters and flood
hazard areas for the objectives of preventing and alleviating flood threats to life and health,
reducing private and public economic losses, and to the extent possible, preserving the
biological values associated with these land and water resources.
(b) The policy and purposes of this subtitle are:
(1) To assist in the guidance of development to minimize the impacts of
flooding;
(2) To provide State guidelines and technical assistance to local
governments in management of flood hazard areas;
(3) To provide for comprehensive watershed management;
(4) To facilitate implementation of projects for flood control;
(5) To encourage and provide for local governmental units to manage
flood–prone lands in a comprehensive manner;

SENATE BILL 687 9
(6) To provide for the biological and environmental quality of the
watersheds of the State; and
(7) To establish a grant program to assist local jurisdictions with:
(i) Implementation of those capital projects included within the
comprehensive flood management plans which are adopted and approved in accordance
with this subtitle; and
(ii) Infrastructure repairs, watershed restoration, and emergency
protection work associated with a flood event.
5–803.1.
(A) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ESTABLISH AND IMPLEMENT A FLOOD RISK
REVIEW PROCESS FOR AREAS IDENTIFIED BY THE DEPARTMENT OR THE
DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES IN STATUTE OR REGULATION AS BEING AT
RISK OF TIDAL OR NONTIDAL FLOODING.
(B) THE FLOOD RISK REVIEW PROCESS SHALL APPLY TO THE
DEPARTMENT’S REVIEW OF ANY PLAN OR PERMIT RELATED TO A PROPOSED
DEVELOPMENT WITHIN AN AREA DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION.
(C) THE FLOOD RISK REVIEW PROCESS SHALL:
(1) INCLUDE AN EVALUATION OF THE POTENTIAL IMPACTS OF THE
PROPOSED DEVELOPMENT ON DOWNSTREAM FLOODING, INCLUDING:
(I) THE CUMULATIVE IMPACTS OF PAST, PRESENT, AND
REASONABLY FORESEEABLE DEVELOPMENT IN THE WATERSHED; AND
(II) THE EFFECTS ON STORMWATER CONVEYANCE, STORAGE,
AND INFILTRATION CAPACITY;
(2) ENSURE CONSISTENCY WITH ANY WATERSHED STUDY OR FLOOD
MANAGEMENT PLAN DEVELOPED UNDER § 5–803 OF THIS SUBTITLE AND UPDATED
THROUGH THE ADVANCING STORMWATER RESILIENCY IN MARYLAND INITIATIVE;
(3) INCORPORATE DATA REGARDING CURRENT AND PROJECTED
PRECIPITATION INTENSITY, DURATION, AND FREQUENCY USING:
(I) THE MOST RECENT CLIMATE–ADJUSTED PRECIPITATION
DATA AND MODELING REQUIRED UNDER § 4–203 OF THIS ARTICLE; AND

SENATE BILL 687
(II) LAND USE AND IMPERVIOUS SURFACE CHANGE TRENDS
IDENTIFIED BY THE DEPARTMENT OF PLANNING AND THE ADVANCING
STORMWATER RESILIENCY IN MARYLAND STUDIES; AND
(4) REQUIRE THE DEPARTMENT TO CONDITION, MODIFY, OR DENY
APPROVAL OF THE PLAN OR PERMIT IF THE DEPARTMENT DETERMINES THAT THE
PROPOSED DEVELOPMENT WOULD:
(I) INCREASE DOWNSTREAM FLOOD HAZARDS OR FLOOD
DAMAGE TO EXISTING COMMUNITIES;
(II) IMPAIR THE EFFECTIVENESS OF WATERSHED–SCALE
FLOOD MANAGEMENT STRATEGIES DEVELOPED UNDER § 5–803 OF THIS SUBTITLE;
OR
(III) CONFLICT WITH STORMWATER QUANTITY STANDARDS
ADOPTED UNDER THE ADVANCING STORMWATER RESILIENCY IN MARYLAND
INITIATIVE.
(D) BEFORE ISSUING A FINAL DETERMINATION ON A PLAN OR PERMIT
SUBJECT TO A FLOOD RISK REVIEW UNDER THIS SECTION, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL
CONSULT WITH:
(1) EACH AFFECTED LOCAL JURISDICTION;
(2) THE DEPARTMENT OF PLANNING; AND
(3) AS APPROPRIATE, THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
OR A WATERSHED ADVISORY GROUP CONVENED UNDER THE ADVANCING
STORMWATER RESILIENCY IN MARYLAND INITIATIVE.
(E) A FINAL DETERMINATION ISSUED UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL BE
INCORPORATED INTO THE LOCAL STORMWATER MANAGEMENT APPROVAL PROCESS
AND SHALL BE BINDING ON THE LOCAL APPROVING AUTHORITY.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.